District of Columbia statutes.
22-1708

Gambling pools and bookmaking; athletic contest defined.

It shall be unlawful for any person, or association of persons, within the District of Columbia to purchase, possess, own, or acquire any chance, right, or interest, tangible or intangible, in any policy lottery or any lottery, or to make or place a bet or wager, accept a bet or wager, gamble or make books or pools on the result of any athletic contest. For the purpose of this section, the term “athletic contest” means any of the following, wherever held or to be held: a football, baseball, softball, basketball, hockey, or polo game, or a tennis, golf, or wrestling match, or a tennis or golf tournament, or a prize fight or boxing match, or a trotting or running race of horses, or a running race of dogs, or any other athletic or sporting event or contest. Any person or association of persons violating this section shall be fined not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01 or imprisoned not more than 180 days, or both.

History

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1331, ch. 854, § 869
May 16, 1908, 35 Stat. 164, ch. 172, § 3
June 29, 1953, 67 Stat. 96, ch. 159, § 206c
Aug. 20, 1994, D.C. Law 10-151, § 105(k), 41 DCR 2608
June 11, 2013, D.C. Law 19-317, § 201(s), 60 DCR 2064

Cross References

Search warrants, see § 23-521 et seq.

Section References

This section is referenced in § 22-1702.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 22-1508.
1973 Ed., § 22-1508.

Effect of Amendments

The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-317 substituted “not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01” for “not more than $1,000” and for “not more than $1,000”.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary amendment of section, see § 105(k) of the Omnibus Criminal Justice Reform Emergency Amendment Act of 1994 (D.C. Act 10-255, June 22, 1994, 41 DCR 4286).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 201(s) of the Criminal Fine Proportionality Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-45, April 1, 2013, 60 DCR 5400, 20 DCSTAT 1300).

Editor's Notes

Applicability of D.C. Law 19-317: Section 401 of D.C. Law 19-317 provided that the act shall apply only to offenses committed on or after June 11, 2013.